dev/adjective/adjective.ne.dix
  <!-- हलुङ्गो; हलुङ्गो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हलुङ्गो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उत्तानो; उत्तानो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उत्तानो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छाडी; छाडी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छाडी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुनढो; सुनढो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुनढो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गुलियो; गुलियो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गुलियो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अमिल्दो; अमिल्द; 2 -->
    <pardef n="अमिल्द/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अपशकुनी; अपशकुनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अपशकुनी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मिल्दोजुल्दो; मिल्द; 2 -->
    <pardef n="मिल्द/ोजुल्दो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोजुल्दो</l>
          <r>ोजुल्दो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाजुल्दा</l>
          <r>ोजुल्दो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाको; पाक; 2 -->
    <pardef n="पाक/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्वतन्त्र; स्वतन्त्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्वतन्त्र__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धर्म; ध; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ध/र्म__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ार्मिक</l>
          <r>र्म<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाकी; पाकी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पाकी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुधा; सुधा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुधा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खास; खास; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खास__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रसिलो; रसिल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="रसिल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वढि; वढि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वढि__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कमार; कमार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कमार__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विभिन्न; विभिन्न; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विभिन्न__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चुह्लो; चुह्लो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चुह्लो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वर्ष; वर्ष; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वर्ष__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीया</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टाठोबठो; टाठ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="टाठ/ोबठो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाबाठा</l>
          <r>ोबठो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मजस्तो; मजस्तो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मजस्तो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सफी; सफी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सफी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खल्लो; खल्लो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खल्लो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उरण्ठेउलो; उरण्ठेउल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उरण्ठेउल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झुठो; झ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="झ/ुठो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुठो</l>
          <r>ुठो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ूठा</l>
          <r>ुठो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अनेक; अनेक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अनेक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थोत्रा; थोत्रा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थोत्रा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- डल्ला; डल्ला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="डल्ला__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लुलो; लुल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लुल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सिधासाधा; स; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स/िधासाधा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीधासाधा</l>
          <r>िधासाधा<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रचलन; प्रचल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रचल/न__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ित</l>
          <r>न<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विकास; विक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विक/ास__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सित</l>
          <r>ास<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बडो; बडो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बडो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अप्ठ्यारो; अप्ठ्यार; 2 -->
    <pardef n="अप्ठ्यार/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बडी; बडी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बडी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बुढो; बुढ; 3 -->
    <pardef n="बुढ/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कौटिनी; कौटिनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कौटिनी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दुहुनो; दुहुन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दुहुन/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एकै; एकै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एकै__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="हलुङ्गो"><i>हलुङ्गो</i><par n="हलुङ्गो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उत्तानो"><i>उत्तानो</i><par n="उत्तानो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छाडी"><i>छाडी</i><par n="छाडी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सुनढो"><i>सुनढो</i><par n="सुनढो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गुलियो"><i>गुलियो</i><par n="गुलियो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अमिल्दो"><i>अमिल्द</i><par n="अमिल्द/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अपशकुनी"><i>अपशकुनी</i><par n="अपशकुनी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मिल्दोजुल्दो"><i>मिल्द</i><par n="मिल्द/ोजुल्दो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पाको"><i>पाक</i><par n="पाक/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वतन्त्र"><i>स्वतन्त्र</i><par n="स्वतन्त्र__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="धर्म"><i>ध</i><par n="ध/र्म__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पाकी"><i>पाकी</i><par n="पाकी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सुधा"><i>सुधा</i><par n="सुधा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खास"><i>खास</i><par n="खास__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="रसिलो"><i>रसिल</i><par n="रसिल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वढि"><i>वढि</i><par n="वढि__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कमार"><i>कमार</i><par n="कमार__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विभिन्न"><i>विभिन्न</i><par n="विभिन्न__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चुह्लो"><i>चुह्लो</i><par n="चुह्लो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वर्ष"><i>वर्ष</i><par n="वर्ष__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="टाठोबठो"><i>टाठ</i><par n="टाठ/ोबठो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मजस्तो"><i>मजस्तो</i><par n="मजस्तो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सफी"><i>सफी</i><par n="सफी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खल्लो"><i>खल्लो</i><par n="खल्लो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उरण्ठेउलो"><i>उरण्ठेउल</i><par n="उरण्ठेउल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="झुठो"><i>झ</i><par n="झ/ुठो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनेक"><i>अनेक</i><par n="अनेक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="थोत्रा"><i>थोत्रा</i><par n="थोत्रा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="डल्ला"><i>डल्ला</i><par n="डल्ला__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लुलो"><i>लुल</i><par n="लुल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सिधासाधा"><i>स</i><par n="स/िधासाधा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रचलन"><i>प्रचल</i><par n="प्रचल/न__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विकास"><i>विक</i><par n="विक/ास__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बडो"><i>बडो</i><par n="बडो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अप्ठ्यारो"><i>अप्ठ्यार</i><par n="अप्ठ्यार/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बडी"><i>बडी</i><par n="बडी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बुढो"><i>बुढ</i><par n="बुढ/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कौटिनी"><i>कौटिनी</i><par n="कौटिनी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दुहुनो"><i>दुहुन</i><par n="दुहुन/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="एकै"><i>एकै</i><par n="एकै__adj"/></e>
